Final source/morphy/foma/Noun-Masc_FrontVowelMidVowel.lexc
!!!nouns.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols N +RT +SG +DF +NOM +CJ +NOM +ACC +ID +FN +VOC +PL +DAT +GEN +ABL 
LEXICON Root
NounMascFrontVowelMidVowelStem;

LEXICON NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel

+N+RT: #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+NOM:යා #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+ACC:යා #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+NOM+CJ:යාත්  #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+ACC+CJ:යාත්  #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+NOM+FN:යායි  #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+ACC+FN:යායි  #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+NOM:යෙක් #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+NOM+FN:යෙකි #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+NOM+CJ:යෙකුත් #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+ACC+CJ:යෙකුත් #;
+N+RT+SG+VOC:යෝ #;
+N+RT+PL+NOM:යෝ  #;
+N+RT+PL+NOM+CJ:යෝත්  #;
+N+RT+PL+NOM+FN:යෝයි  #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+ACC:යෙකු #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+ACC+FN:යෙකුයි #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+ACC+CJ:යෙකුත්  #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+ACC:යකු #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+ACC+FN:යකුයි #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+ACC+CJ:යකුත්  #;
+N+RT+PL+ACC:යන්  #;
+N+RT+PL+ACC+CJ:යනුත්  #;
+N+RT+PL+ACC+FN:යනුයි  #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+DAT:යාට #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+DAT+CJ:යාටත් #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+DAT+FN:යාටයි #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+DAT:යෙකුට #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+DAT+CJ:යෙකුටත් #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+DAT+FN:යෙකුටයි #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+DAT:යකුට #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+DAT+CJ:යකුටත් #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+DAT+FN:යකුටයි #;
+N+RT+PL+DAT:යන්ට #;
+N+RT+PL+DAT+CJ:යන්ටත් #;
+N+RT+PL+DAT+FN:යන්ටයි #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+ABL:යාගෙන් #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+ABL+CJ:යාගෙනුත් #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+ABL+FN:යාගෙනි #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+ABL:යෙකුගෙන් #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+ABL+CJ:යෙකුගෙනුත් #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+ABL+FN:යෙකුගෙනි #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+ABL:යකුගෙන් #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+ABL+CJ:යකුගෙනුත් #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+ABL+FN:යකුගෙනි #;
+N+RT+PL+ABL:යන්ගෙන් #;
+N+RT+PL+ABL+CJ:යන්ගෙනුත් #;
+N+RT+PL+ABL+FN:යන්ගෙනි #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+GEN:යාගේ #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+GEN+CJ:යාගේත් #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+GEN+FN:යාගේයි #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+GEN:යගෙ #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+GEN+CJ:යගෙත් #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+GEN+FN:යගෙයි #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+GEN:යෙකුගේ #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+GEN+CJ:යෙකුගේත් #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+GEN+FN:යෙකුගේයි #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+GEN:යකුගේ #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+GEN+CJ:යකුගේත් #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+GEN+FN:යකුගේයි #;
+N+RT+PL+GEN:යන්ගේ #;
+N+RT+PL+GEN+CJ:යන්ගේත් #;
+N+RT+PL+GEN+FN:යන්ගේයි #;
+N+RT+PL+VOC:යනි  #;

LEXICON NounMascFrontVowelMidVowelStem   
අග්‍රාමාත්‍ය	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
අටුවාචාර්යවර	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
අතිපණ්ඩිත	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
අධම	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
අධිකාරවාදි	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
අධිපතිවාදි	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
අන්තගාමි	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
අනාගතවාදි	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
අනුචර	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
අනුශූර	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
අපේක්ෂක	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
අමනුෂ්‍ය	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
අයකැමි	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
අලිකාර	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
අශ්වාරෝහක	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
අසත්‍යවාදි	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
අසුබවාදි	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
ආගමනික	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
ආචාර්යෝත්තම	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
ආණ්ඩුකාරවර	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
ආදායම්ලාභි	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
ආධුනික	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
ආරච්චි	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
ආසන්නතම	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
ඇම්බැට්ට	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
ඉලන්දාරි	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
උදව්කාර	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
උපනායක	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
ඍෂිවර	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
කට්ටිවාදි	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
කතුවර	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
කබර	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
කවට	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
ක්‍රීඩක	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
කාර්මික	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
කුමන්ත්‍රණකාර	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
කුලීකාර	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
කොමසාරිස්වර	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
කෝඩුකාර	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
ගන්ධබ්බ	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
ග්‍රහ	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
ගැරඬි	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
ගොයි	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
චණ්ඩි	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
චින්තනවාදි	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
ඡන්දදායක	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
ජනපදවැසි	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
ජනාධිපතිවර	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
ජාත්‍යන්තරවාදි	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
ජෛන	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
ණයගැති	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
තරුණ	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
තාත්ත්විකවාදි	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
තීරක	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
දඟකාර	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
ද්‍රෝහි	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
දැහැමි	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
දුර්ජන	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
දෙවි	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
දේශද්‍රෝහි	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
දොරටුපාල	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
ධනායෝජක	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
ධාර්මික	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
නර	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
න්‍යායවාදි	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
නාස්තිකාර	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
නිබන්ධක	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
නිර්වාණගාමි	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
නිවැසි	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
නීතිවේදි	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
පණ්ඩිත	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
පරපීඩාකාමි	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
පරාජික	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
පරිවර්තක	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
පසුගාමි	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
ප්‍රජාතන්ත්‍රවාදි	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
ප්‍රතිසංස්කරණවාදි	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
ප්‍රබලතම	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
ප්‍රවේශදායක	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
ප්‍රේමවන්ත	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
පාපතර	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
පි	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
පීඩක	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
පුරවැසි	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
පෘෂ්ඨවංශික	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
බලකාමි	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
බහුශ්‍රැත	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
බුද්ධිවාදි	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
භක්තික	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
භූත	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
මත්ස්‍ය	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
මනෝවිද්‍යාඥ	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
මහජන	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
මහේස්ත්‍රාත්වර	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
මානවවාදි	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
මැඬි	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
මුගටි	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
මූලධර්මවාදි	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
යක්ෂ	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
යාචක	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
යෝනක	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
රසඥ	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
රාජතාන්ත්‍රික	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
රැහැයි	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
ලාභි	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
ලේඬි	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
වඩුකාර්මික	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
වනසත්වවේදී	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
වසල	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
ව්‍යුහවාදි	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
වාමාංශික	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
වැසි	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
විගමනික	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
විද්‍යාඥ	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
විනයධර	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
විමර්ශනවාදි	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
විශ්ලේෂක	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
විශිෂ්ටතම	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
වෘද්ධ	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
වේදාන්තවාදි	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
වෛශ්‍ය	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
ශ්‍රාවක	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
ශාස්ත්‍රවේදි	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
ශිෂ්‍යත්වලාභි	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
සංක්‍රමණික	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
සංරක්ෂක	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
සංශෝධක	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
සඟ	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
සත්වවේදි	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
සන්නාසි	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
සමකාලික	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
සම්පාදක	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
සමීපතම	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
සල්ලාල	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
ස්ථානාධිපති	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
සාංගමික	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
සාමිවර	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
සිංහල	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
සිසුසිසුවි	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
සුර	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
සෘෂිවර	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
සෙනෙහෙවන්ත	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
සේවාදායක	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
හමුදාපතිවර	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
හිතුවක්කාර	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
හුරුබුහුටි	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
හේවාපන්නකාර	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
ළිහිණි	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
අධිනීතිඥ	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
අධිනීතීඥ	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
භුත	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
කීර්තිධර	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
චින්පන්සි	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
රාජවංශික	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
සුපවේදි	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
අසාදිත	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
ඇන්ඩ්‍රි	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
උත්සාහවන්ත	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
කන්ඨක	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
කි‍්‍ර	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
ක‍්‍රි	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
ක්රිා	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
ඛ්ඹ්තුවක්කාර	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
ගුරුනායක	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
චන්ද්රම	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
ජාතිද්‍රෝහි	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
තනතුරුධාරි	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
දැවන්ත	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
ද්‍රෝහි	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
පරපෝශිත	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
පාර්ශ්වකාර	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
පුමුඛ	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
පෝටි	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
ප්‍රාමාණික	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
මහාම	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
මෙරා	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
යේල්	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
වරරෝජ	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
ශ්‍රේෂඨ	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
සින්ඩි	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
හත්වෙනි	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
ඇබිත්ත	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
නවජ	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
පුද්ග	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
ඉතිහාසාඥ	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
මිථ්‍යාදෘෂ්ටික	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
අනුග්‍රාහක	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
අබ්බගාත	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
ධීවර	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
තාන්ත්‍රික	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
ලාභි	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
නියොජිත	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
කම්මැළි	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
නර්තක	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
මනුශ්‍ය	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
තානාපතිවර	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
විද්යාඥ	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
ලේකම්වර	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
නිවැසි	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
නැදෑ	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
සමාජවාදි	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
කපටි	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
වැඩකාර	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
රෝගකාරක	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
පිටස්තර	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
විදේශීක	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
චූදිත	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
සේනාධිපති	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
ප්‍රතිවාදි	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
ක්ෂුද්‍රජීවි	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
වෛද්‍යවර	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
දූෂක	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
අවිවාහක	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
බ්‍රාහ්ම	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
කාමි	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
හිමි	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
අවිහිංසාවාදි	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
සූර්ය	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
කම්මැලි	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
අධිරාජ්‍ය	NounMascFrontVowelMidVowel;
